Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-268
County agricultural society; reinstatement; certificate; contents; filing.

The certificate filed pursuant to section 2-267 shall set forth (1) the name of the county agricultural society, which name shall be the existing name of the society or the name it bore when its corporate existence expired, except as otherwise provided in sections 2-267 to 2-271, (2) whether the renewal, restoration, or revival is to be perpetual and if not the time for which the renewal, restoration, or revival is to continue, (3) that the society desiring to be renewed or revived and so renewing or reviving its corporate existence was duly organized under the laws of the State of Nebraska, and (4) the date when the society became inoperative and that this certificate for renewal or revival is filed by authority of those who were directors or managers of the society at the time its corporate existence expired or who were elected or appointed directors of the society as provided in section 2-271. A copy of the certificate, certified by the Secretary of State, shall be recorded in the office of the clerk in and for the county in which the original articles of incorporation of the society are recorded. Upon filing and recording the original of the certificate of revival in the office of the Secretary of State, the society shall be renewed and revived with the same force and effect as if its corporate existence had not become inoperative.

Laws 1995, LB 671, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 2-242;

Laws 1997, LB 469, § 19.